Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 4. Protection of Cooperative Purchasers.
§ 55.1-2168.
Statute of limitations for warranties.

A judicial proceeding for breach of any obligation arising under §

55.1-2165

or

55.1-2166

must be commenced within six years after the cause of action accrues, but the parties may agree to reduce the period of limitation to not less than two years. With respect to a unit that may be occupied for residential use, an agreement to reduce the period of limitation must be evidenced by a separate instrument executed by the purchaser of the cooperative interest for that unit.

Subject to subsection C, a cause of action for breach of warranty of quality, regardless of the purchaser’s lack of knowledge of the breach, accrues:

As to a unit, at the time the purchaser to whom the warranty is first made enters into possession if a possessory interest was conveyed, or at the time of acceptance of the instrument of conveyance if a nonpossessory interest was conveyed; and

As to each common element, at the time the common element is completed or, if later, (i) as to a common element that may be added to the cooperative or portion of the cooperative, at the time the first cooperative interest for a unit in such cooperative interest is conveyed to a bona fide purchaser, or (ii) as to a common element within any other portion of the cooperative, at the first time a cooperative interest in the cooperative is conveyed to a bona fide purchaser.

If a warranty of quality explicitly extends to future performance or duration of any improvement or component of the cooperative, the cause of action accrues at the time the breach is discovered or at the end of the period for which the warranty explicitly extends, whichever is earlier.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-491; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2169.
Effect of violation on rights of action; attorney fees; arbitration of disputes.

If a declarant or any other person subject to this chapter fails to comply with any provision of this chapter or any provision of the declaration or bylaws, any person or class of persons adversely affected by the failure to comply has a claim for appropriate relief. Punitive damages may be awarded for a willful failure to comply with this chapter. The court, in an appropriate case, may award reasonable attorney fees.

A declaration may provide for the arbitration of disputes or other means of alternative dispute resolution. Any such arbitration held in accordance with this subsection shall be consistent with the provisions of this chapter and Chapter 21 (§

8.01-577

et seq.) of Title 8.01. The place of any such arbitration or alternative dispute resolution shall be held in the county or city in which the development is located or as mutually agreed by the parties.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-492; 1993, c. 849; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2170.
Labeling of promotional material.

No promotional material may be displayed or delivered to prospective purchasers that describes or portrays improvements that are not in existence, unless the description or portrayal of the improvement in the promotional material is conspicuously labeled or identified either as “MUST BE BUILT” or “NEED NOT BE BUILT.”

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-493; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2171.
Declarant’s obligation to complete and restore.

The declarant shall complete all improvements depicted on any site plan or other graphic representation included in the public offering statement or in any promotional material distributed by or for the declarant unless that improvement is labeled “NEED NOT BE BUILT.”

The declarant is subject to liability for the prompt repair and restoration, to a condition compatible with the remainder of the cooperative, of any portion of the cooperative affected by the exercise of rights reserved pursuant to or created by §§

55.1-2120

,

55.1-2121

,

55.1-2122

,

55.1-2123

,

55.1-2125

, and

55.1-2126

.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-494; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2172.
Substantial completion of units.

In the case of a sale of a cooperative interest where delivery of a public offering statement is required, a contract of sale may be executed, but no interest in that cooperative interest may be conveyed, except pursuant to subsection B of §

55.1-2176

, until the declaration is recorded and the unit that is a part of that cooperative interest is substantially completed, as evidenced by a recorded certificate of substantial completion executed by an independent, registered architect, surveyor, or engineer or by issuance of a certificate of occupancy authorized by law.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-495; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.